North Carolina, session 2025, HB642.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The sum of thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to Scotland County
for improvements or upgrades to the County's wastewater treatment plant.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H642-v-1*